Arkansas, session 2025, SB506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-19-105(b)(20), concerning the exceptions
to the examination and copying of public records under the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, is repealed.
(20) Electronic data information maintained by a disaster
recovery system;








*LGL040*
03/18/2025 2:26:18 PM LGL040